Maryland, session 2026, HB0015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0015*

HOUSE BILL 15
(k) (1) “Public record” means the original or any copy of any documentary
material that:
(i) is made by:
1. a unit or an instrumentality of the State or of a political
subdivision or received by the unit or instrumentality in connection with the transaction of
public business; [and] OR
2. A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT RECEIVES
$50,000 OR MORE ANNUALLY FROM STATE GRANTS, STATE BOND PROCEEDS, OR
LOCAL IMPACT GRANTS; AND
(ii) is in any form, including:
1. a card;
2. a computerized record;
3. correspondence;
4. a drawing;
5. film or microfilm;
6. a form;
7. a map;
8. a photograph or photostat;
9. a recording; or
10. a tape.
(2) “Public record” includes a document that lists the salary of an employee
of a unit or an instrumentality of the State or of a political subdivision OR OF A
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(3) “Public record” does not include:
(i) a digital photographic image or signature of an individual, or the
actual stored data of the image or signature, recorded by the Motor Vehicle Administration;
or

HOUSE BILL 15 3
(ii) a record or any information submitted to the Public Access
Ombudsman or the Board under Subtitle 1B of this title.
4–102.
The State, a political subdivision, [or] a unit of the State or of a political subdivision,
OR A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION may keep only the information about a person that:
(1) is needed by the State, the political subdivision, [or] the unit, OR THE
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION to accomplish a governmental purpose that is authorized or
required to be accomplished under:
(i) a statute or any other legislative mandate;
(ii) an executive order of the Governor;
(iii) an executive order of the chief executive of a local jurisdiction; or
(iv) a judicial rule; and
(2) is relevant to accomplishment of the purpose.
4–104.
(a) Each official custodian shall adopt a policy of proactive disclosure of public
records that are available for inspection under this title.
(b) The policy adopted under subsection (a) of this section may:
(1) vary as appropriate to the type of public record and to reflect the staff
and budgetary resources of the governmental unit OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION; and
(2) include publication of public records on the website of the governmental
unit OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION, to the extent practicable, or publication of prior
responses to requests for inspection made under this title.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.